District of Columbia statutes.
2-901

Transferred

Legislative findings; purposes.

Recodified as § 8-171.01.

Mar. 4, 1981, D.C. Law 3-132, § 2, 28 DCR 445
Energy Conservation and Production Act, see 42 U.S.C. § 6801 et seq.
Energy Policy Act of 1992, see 42 U.S.C. § 13201 et seq.
Energy Policy and Conservation Act, see 42 U.S.C. § 6201 et seq.
Nonnuclear energy research and development, see 42 U.S.C. § 5901 et seq.
Residential energy conservation, see 42 U.S.C. § 8231 et seq.
Solar energy research and development, see 42 U.S.C. § 5581.
Solar heating and cooling, see 42 U.S.C. § 5501 et seq.
Wind Energy Systems Act, see 42 U.S.C. § 9201 et seq.